District of Columbia statutes.
29-1205.07

Interested transactions.

(a)

For the purposes of this section, the term “covered party” means a trustee, officer, employee, or manager of a statutory trust, or a related party of a trustee, officer, employee, manager, or other person designated pursuant to § 29-1201.03(e)(8) or (9).

(b)

Subject to subsection (c) of this section, a covered party may lend money to, borrow money from, act as a surety, guarantor, or endorser for, guarantee or assume an obligation of, provide collateral for, or do other business with the statutory trust and, subject to law other than this title, has the same rights and obligations with respect to those matters as a person that is not a covered party.

(c)

A transaction described in subsection (b) of this section shall be voidable by the statutory trust unless the covered party shows that the transaction is fair to the trust.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(l)(6)(D), 59 DCR 13171

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-1206.07.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 added “or (9)” at the end of (a).

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 507 of the Uniform Statutory Trust Entity Act.

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.